California, session 20252026, AB2541.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) California’s strength lies in its rich cultural diversity, and the state’s Latino community has made profound contributions to California’s social, artistic, and civic life.(b) Lowriding originated in California in the mid-1940s in Los Angeles and grew alongside the Chicano movement of the 1960s and 1970s as both an artistic expression and a statement of cultural identity during a time of inequality and segregation.(c) Lowrider vehicles are handcrafted works of art that reflect cultural history, folklore, faith traditions, and personal storytelling, representing a unique and enduring form of Latino artistic expression.(d) Lowrider car clubs have long supported their communities through charitable events, public health initiatives, civic engagement, and collaboration with local leaders to promote safe and positive community gatherings.(e) The Legislature has recognized the cultural significance of lowriding by declaring the first Sunday of summer to be observed as California Lowrider Day through Assembly Concurrent Resolution 102 of the 2023–24 Regular Session, celebrating the history, artistry, and community impact of lowrider culture.(f) The Legislature has recognized the prominent role that women have always had in the lowrider car scene and the proliferation of women’s car clubs as a space for women who want to drive and work on their own lowrider cars so that other young women can see that it is possible for women to be behind the wheel too.(g) While cruising is most popular among Latinos, cruising is becoming increasingly popular among many other groups, including Armenians, African Americans, and Persians across the state.(h) Establishing The Lowrider specialized license plate will further honor this uniquely Californian cultural tradition while generating funding to support lowrider arts and cultural programs administered through the Arts Council.SEC. 2. Section 5167 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:5167. (a) (1) The Arts Council shall apply to the department to sponsor “The Lowrider” specialized license plate for the purposes described in subdivision (c).(2) The department shall issue specialized license plates for that program if the Arts Council satisfies the requirements of Section 5156.(b) (1) The department, in consultation with the Arts Council, shall design The Lowrider license plates as described in this section.(2) The design of the plates shall reflect lowrider culture and heritage and shall be approved by the department in consultation with the Arts Council.(A) The department and the Arts Council may consult with a nonprofit entity with a mission of supporting the lowrider community and Latino culture for plate design consultation, stakeholder engagement, publicity, and community outreach.(B) The department and the Arts Council may accept and use donated artwork from California artists for purposes of this requirement.(C) The department and the Arts Council may use funds from nonprofit or private sources to augment implementation.(3) The department shall, in consultation with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, determine whether the design obscures the readability of the license plate.(c) (1) The fees specified in Section 5157 shall be imposed for the issuance, renewal, or transfer of the specialized license plates authorized by this section.(2) (A) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 5157, proceeds shall be used, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the Arts Council, to fund projects related to the purpose of supporting lowrider arts, cultural preservation efforts, youth engagement programs, public exhibitions, community-based cultural events, and educational initiatives that celebrate and preserve the history and cultural contributions of lowrider communities in California.(B) The Arts Council shall prioritize nonprofit entities with a mission of supporting the lowrider community and Latino culture.(C) Upon approval by the Arts Council, a nonprofit entity may assist in the review and administration of these grants. An entity that assists in the review and administration of these grants may request and qualify for a 4-percent to 6-percent administrative fee, inclusive.